Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1162.
do enact as follows:SB1162,11Section 1. 49.22 (9m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1162,2,5249.22 (9m) Neither the department nor its designee may seek recovery from 3an alleged father of pregnancy or birth expenses paid by the state under the 4Medical Assistance program on behalf of an unmarried person who gave birth and 5who was a recipient of Medical Assistance at the time of the birth.SB1162,26Section 2. 49.45 (19) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1162,2,13749.45 (19) (a) As Except as provided in par. (c), as a condition of eligibility for 8medical assistance, a person shall, notwithstanding other provisions of the 9statutes, be deemed to have assigned to the state, by applying for or receiving 10medical assistance, any rights to medical support or other payment of medical 11expenses from any other person, including rights to unpaid amounts accrued at the 12time of application for medical assistance as well as any rights to support accruing 13during the time for which medical assistance is paid.SB1162,314Section 3. 49.45 (19) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1162,3,21549.45 (19) (c) If the mother of a child was enrolled in a health maintenance 16organization or other prepaid health care plan under medical assistance at the time 17of the child’s birth, The state may not seek recovery of birth expenses that may be 1recovered by the state under this subsection are the birth expenses incurred by the 2health maintenance organization or other prepaid health care plan.SB1162,43Section 4. 767.804 (3) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1162,3,144767.804 (3) (d) 1. An order establishing the amount of the father’s obligation 5to pay or contribute to the reasonable expenses of the mother’s pregnancy and the 6child’s birth, except that the court may not order a father to pay expenses under this 7subsection for the recovery of expenses paid by the state under the Medical 8Assistance program on behalf of an unmarried person who gave birth and who was 9a recipient of Medical Assistance at the time of the birth. The amount established 10may not exceed one-half of the total actual and reasonable pregnancy and birth 11expenses. The order also shall specify the court’s findings as to whether the father’s 12income is at or below the poverty line established under 42 USC 9902 (2), and shall 13specify whether periodic payments are due on the obligation, based on the father’s 14ability to pay or contribute to those expenses.SB1162,515Section 5. 767.805 (4) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1162,4,316767.805 (4) (d) 1. An order establishing the amount of the father’s obligation 17to pay or contribute to the reasonable expenses of the mother’s pregnancy and the 18child’s birth, except that the court may not order a father to pay expenses under this 19subsection for the recovery of expenses paid by the state under the Medical 20Assistance program on behalf of an unmarried person who gave birth and who was 21a recipient of Medical Assistance at the time of the birth. The amount established 22may not exceed one-half of the total actual and reasonable pregnancy and birth 23expenses. The order also shall specify the court’s findings as to whether the father’s 1income is at or below the poverty line established under 42 USC 9902 (2), and shall 2specify whether periodic payments are due on the obligation, based on the father’s 3ability to pay or contribute to those expenses.SB1162,64Section 6. 767.89 (3) (e) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1162,4,155767.89 (3) (e) 1. An order establishing the amount of the father’s obligation to 6pay or contribute to the reasonable expenses of the mother’s pregnancy and the 7child’s birth, except that the court may not order a father to pay expenses under this 8subsection for the recovery of expenses paid by the state under the Medical 9Assistance program on behalf of an unmarried person who gave birth and who was 10a recipient of Medical Assistance at the time of the birth. The amount established 11may not exceed one-half of the total actual and reasonable pregnancy and birth 12expenses. The order also shall specify the court’s findings as to whether the father’s 13income is at or below the poverty line established under 42 USC 9902 (2), and shall 14specify whether periodic payments are due on the obligation, based on the father’s 15ability to pay or contribute to those expenses.SB1162,716Section 7. Initial applicability.SB1162,4,1917(1) Elimination of birth cost recovery by the state. The treatment of ss. 18767.804 (3) (d) 1., 767.805 (4) (d) 1., and 767.89 (3) (e) 1. first applies to an order or 19judgment relating to paternity issued on the effective date of this subsection.SB1162,4,2020